Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 11
Employment Offices and Agencies

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

Cross References.

Establishment of state employment service, § 11-10-304.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-11-101. Recruitment of labor by foreign labor agents.

No foreign labor agent, labor bureau or employment agency, or any other person shall enter this state and attempt to hire, induce, or take from this state any labor, singularly or in groups, for any purpose, whether or not a fee or charge is extracted from the worker, without first applying to the Director of the Division of Labor for a license to do so and filing with the director:

A statement as to where the labor is to be taken, for what purpose, for what length of time, and whether transportation is to be paid to and from the destination, if temporary;

A statement of the financial standing of the employer desiring the labor;

An affidavit of authority to represent the employer in this state; and

Whatever other information the director may require.

The director shall determine whether the person desiring the labor from this state is a labor agent, labor bureau, or employment agency and, if so, whether the applicant is qualified to be licensed under the laws of this state and according to the provisions of this section.

The director, after the investigation, may refuse to license or register the applicant until the applicant has complied with the provisions of this section.

The applicant shall, in the event of unfavorable action by the director, have the right of appeal to the proper court.

This section is cumulative to all existing laws affecting the hiring or employment of labor.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 272, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-1011, 81-1012; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5367.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in the introductory language of (a).

Subchapter 2
— Private Employment Agencies

Effective Dates.

Acts 1977, No. 390, § 4: Mar. 10, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that confusion exists in the enforcement of the law because Act 493 of 1975 does not specifically exempt preparers of resumes. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-11-201. Title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Arkansas Private Employment Agency Act of 1975”.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1013.

11-11-202. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agency manager” means the individual designated by the employment agency to conduct the general management, administration, and operation of a designated employment agency office. Every employment agency must maintain a licensed agency manager at each of its separate office locations;

“Applicant” except when used to describe an applicant for an employment agency or agency manager's or counselor's license means any person, whether employed or unemployed, seeking or entering into an arrangement for employment or change of employment through the medium or service of an employment agency;

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

“Employee” means a person performing or seeking to perform work or service of any kind or character for compensation;

“Employer” means a person employing or seeking to employ a person for compensation;

“Employment agent” or “employment agency” means any person engaged for hire, compensation, gain, or profit in the business of furnishing persons seeking employment with information or other service enabling the persons to procure employment by or through employers or furnishing any other person who may be seeking to employ or may be in the market for help of any kind with information enabling the other person to procure help.

However, “employment agent” or “employment agency” does not mean:

Any person who prepares resumes for individuals for employment purposes if the person who prepares the resumes does not refer or purport to refer prospective employees to employers or employers to prospective employees, does not represent himself or herself as an employment agency, or does not have any financial connection with any employment agency;

Any person who employs individuals to render part-time or temporary services to, for, or under the direction of a third person if the person employing the individuals, in addition to paying wages or salaries, pays federal Social Security taxes and state and federal unemployment insurance and secures work-service to, for, or under the direction of a third person;

Any bona fide nursing school, nurses' registry, management consulting firm, business school, or vocational school whose primary function and purpose is training and education, except that if such an organization charges a fee, directly or indirectly, for job placement of individuals, the organization shall be an employment agency within the meaning of this subchapter;

A labor organization;

Any person who publishes advertisements placed and paid for by a third person seeking employment or an employee, provided that the person does not procure or offer to procure employment or employees; or

Any person who contracts with an employer to recruit employees for the employer without charge to the prospective employee;

“Employment counselor” means an employee of any employment agency who interviews, counsels, or advises applicants or employers, or both, on employment or allied problems or who makes or arranges contracts or contacts between employers and employees. The term “employment counselor” includes employees who solicit orders for employees from prospective employers;

“Fee” shall mean anything of value, including any money or other valuable consideration exacted, charged, collected, or received, directly or indirectly, or paid or contracted to be paid for any services or act by an employment agency; and

“Person” means any individual, company, firm, association, partnership, or corporation.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 2; 1977, No. 390, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1014; Acts 1989, No. 750, § 1; 1997, No. 435, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5368.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment repealed the defined terms “department” and “director”.

11-11-203. Penalty.

The Director of the Division of Labor shall have authority to impose a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for violation of the provisions of this subchapter by an employment agency or its employees or agents.

The director shall notify the employment agency in writing of the reasons for imposition of a fine and at that time shall make available to the employment agency a signed written statement by any individual having filed a complaint with the director relative to the matter for which a fine has been imposed by the director.

The agency shall have the right to a hearing before the director and the right to judicial review provided by § 11-11-223 with respect to the fine.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1021; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5369.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

11-11-204. Director and division — Powers and duties.

It shall be the duty of the Division of Labor, and it shall have the power, jurisdiction, and authority to administer and enforce the provisions of this subchapter.

The Director of the Division of Labor shall have the power, jurisdiction, and authority to issue licenses to employment agencies, agency managers, and counselors and to refuse to issue, revoke, or suspend the licenses when, after due investigation, and in compliance with the procedures set forth in §§ 11-11-221 and 11-11-222, the director finds that the applicant is for good and sufficient cause unfit to be an employment agent, agency manager, or counselor within the meaning of this subchapter or any rules or orders lawfully promulgated under this subchapter.

Complaints against any person, employment agent, agency manager, or counselor may be made to the division orally or in writing.

The director shall have the power to compel attendance of witnesses by issuance of subpoenas, administer oaths, direct production of documents and records, and direct taking of testimony and evidence concerning all matters within the jurisdiction of the division.

The director may order testimony to be taken by deposition in any proceeding pending before the division at any stage of the proceeding.

The director or his or her duly authorized agent shall at all reasonable times have access to, for the purpose of examination and copying, the books, records, papers, and documents of any person being investigated or proceeded against under the provisions of this subchapter, so long as the books, records, papers, or documents sought to be inspected or copied are reasonably related to the investigation or proceeding being conducted by the director.

The director or his or her authorized agent shall, upon application of any party to proceedings before the director, issue to the party subpoenas requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of any books, records, papers, or documents reasonably related to issues involved in proceedings before the director or an investigation conducted by the director.

If any person in proceedings before the director or in investigations conducted by the director disobeys or resists any lawful order or process issued by the director or his or her authorized agents, or fails to produce, after being lawfully directed to do so, any book, paper, record, or document, or refuses to appear and testify after being subpoenaed to do so, the director shall certify the facts to any court of competent jurisdiction in the state or to the Pulaski County Circuit Court.

The court shall have authority to conduct hearings and punish any person for failure or refusal to testify or produce books, papers, documents, or records subpoenaed or ordered by the director as though the conduct constituted contempt of court.

Witnesses summoned by the director or his or her authorized agent shall be paid the same fees and mileage paid to witnesses in the courts of this state.

The director may prescribe such rules for the conduct of the business of private employment agencies as necessary to implement this subchapter.

These rules shall have the force and effect of law and shall be enforced by the director in the same manner as the provisions of this subchapter.

Adoption of rules pursuant to this subsection shall be carried out in compliance with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

The division shall have authority to investigate employment agents, agency managers, and counselors. The division shall have the right to examine records required by law to be kept and maintained by employment agents, agency managers, and counselors and to examine the offices where the business is or shall be conducted by them.

The division may seek to recover in a court of competent jurisdiction fees charged or collected in violation of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1021; Acts 2007, No. 827, § 126; 2009, No. 405, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 835-837; 2019, No. 910, §
5370.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (b); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (d)(1) and (d)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (a); substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (b); and substituted “division” for “department” in the section heading and throughout the section.

11-11-205 — 11-11-207. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning creation, members, officers, and powers and duties of the Arkansas Employment Agency Advisory Council, were repealed by Acts 2007, No. 827, § 127. These sections were derived from the following sources:

11-11-205. Acts 1975, No. 493, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1015; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 62.

11-11-206. Acts 1975, No. 493, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1015.

11-11-207. Acts 1975, No. 493, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1015.

11-11-208. License required — Penalties.

No person shall engage in the business of or act as an employment agent, agency manager, or counselor unless he or she first obtains a license from the Division of Labor.

Any person who shall engage in the business of or act as an employment agent, agency manager, or counselor without first procuring a license is guilty of a misdemeanor.

He or she shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) and not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each day of acting as an employment agent, agency manager, or counselor without a license or by imprisonment for not more than three (3) months, or by both.

In addition to the penalties described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section, upon petition of the Director of the Division of Labor, any court in the state having the statutory power to enjoin or restrain shall have jurisdiction to restrain and enjoin any person who engages in the business of or acts as an employment agent, agency manager, or counselor without having first procured a license for so engaging or acting.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 4; 1977, No. 390, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1016; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5371.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (a).

11-11-209. Certificate of exemption required for certain organizations.

Bona fide nursing schools, nurses' registries, management consulting firms, business schools, vocational schools whose primary function and purpose is training and education, and resume services shall obtain from the Director of the Division of Labor a certificate of exemption from the requirements of this subchapter.

In connection with issuance of a certificate of exemption and with respect to an organization's continued eligibility for a previously issued certificate of exemption, the director shall have those investigative powers conferred by § 11-11-204.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 2; 1977, No. 390, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1014; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5372.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

11-11-210. Employment counselor's license — Application — Qualifications.

To be eligible for application for an employment counselor's license, the applicant shall be:

A citizen of the United States;

Of good moral character;

A person whose license has not been revoked within two (2) years from the date of application; and

Able to demonstrate business integrity.

Every applicant for an initial license for employment counselor shall file with the Division of Labor a written application on a form prescribed and furnished by the Director of the Division of Labor.

The applicant shall file at least two (2) letters of character reference from persons of reputed business or professional integrity.

This application shall contain information prescribed by the director.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1017; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5373.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” and “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (b)(1).

11-11-211. Agency manager license — Application — Qualifications.

To be eligible to apply for a license to act as an agency manager, the applicant shall be:

A citizen of the United States;

Of good moral character;

At least twenty-one (21) years of age;

A person whose license has not been revoked within two (2) years from the date of the application;

A person who has completed the twelfth grade, except that the Director of the Division of Labor may establish proof necessary to him or her that the applicant is possessed of a twelfth-grade education in terms of intellectual competency, judgment, and achievement; and

A person who demonstrates business integrity, financial responsibility, and judgment.

Every applicant for an initial license for agency manager shall file with the Division of Labor a written application on a form prescribed and furnished by the director.

The applicant shall file at least two (2) letters of character reference from persons of reputed business or professional integrity.

This application shall contain information prescribed by the director.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1017; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 5374, 5375.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a)(5); and substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (b)(1).

11-11-212. Employment agency license — Application — Qualifications.

To be eligible to apply for a license to operate an employment agency, the applicant shall be:

A citizen of the United States;

Of good moral character;

At least twenty-one (21) years of age;

A person whose license has not been revoked within two (2) years from the date of the application;

A person who has completed the twelfth grade, except that the Director of the Division of Labor may establish proof necessary to him or her that the applicant is possessed of a twelfth-grade education in terms of intellectual competency, judgment, and achievement; and

A person who demonstrates business integrity, financial responsibility, and judgment.

Every applicant for an initial employment agency license and every applicant for a renewal license shall file with the Director of the Division of Labor a completed application on a form prescribed and furnished by the Director of the Division of Labor.

The application shall be signed by the applicant and sworn to before anyone qualified by law to administer oaths.

If the applicant is a corporation, the application shall state the names and home addresses of all shareholders, officers, and directors of the corporation and shall be signed and sworn to by the president, treasurer, and secretary thereof.

If the applicant is a partnership, the application shall state the names and home addresses of all partners therein and shall be signed and sworn to by all of them.

The applicant shall file at least two (2) letters of character reference from persons of reputed business or professional integrity.

This application shall also contain such other information as the Director of the Division of Labor may prescribe.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1017; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5376.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a)(5).

11-11-213. Employment agency license — Bond required — Action on the bond.

Every application for issuance or renewal of an employment agency's license shall be accompanied by a bond in the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) with a duly licensed surety company or companies authorized to do business in this state.

The terms and conditions of the bond shall be approved by the Director of the Division of Labor.

The bond shall be conditioned that the employment agency and each member, employee, shareholder, director, or officer of a person, firm, partnership, corporation, or association operating as the employment agency will not violate the provisions of this subchapter or violate rules or orders lawfully promulgated by the director or violate the terms of any contract made by the employment agent in the conduct of its business.

If any person shall be aggrieved by the misconduct of any licensee, that person may maintain an action in his or her own name upon the bond of the employment agency in any court of competent jurisdiction or in the Pulaski County Circuit Court.

All claims shall be assignable, and the assignee shall be entitled to the same remedies upon the bond of the licensee as the person aggrieved would have been entitled to if the claim had not been assigned.

Any claim so assigned may be enforced in the name of the assignee.

Any remedies given by this section shall not be exclusive of any other remedy that would otherwise exist.

Action on the bond required by this section may be maintained by the director in the name of the state in any court of competent jurisdiction or in the Pulaski County Circuit Court, for the benefit of any person or persons aggrieved by the misconduct of the licensee.

If any licensee fails to file a new bond with the Division of Labor within thirty (30) days after notice of cancellation by the surety of the bond required by this section, the license issued to the principal under the bond is suspended until such time as a new surety bond is filed with and approved by the director.

A person whose license is suspended pursuant to this subsection shall not carry on the business of an employment agency during the period of the suspension.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1018; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 838; 2019, No. 910, §§
5377, 5378.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (a)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a)(2); and substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (d)(1).

11-11-214. Investigation of license applicant by director.

Upon filing of an application for a license as provided in this subchapter, the Director of the Division of Labor shall cause an investigation to be made regarding the character, business integrity, and financial responsibility of the license applicant.

The director shall also determine the suitability or unsuitability of the applicant's proposed office location.

An application for an employment agency's, agency manager's, or employment counselor's license shall be rejected by the director if it is found that any person named in the license application is not of good moral character, business integrity, or financial responsibility or if there is good and sufficient reason within the meaning and purpose of this subchapter for rejecting the application.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1017; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5379.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

11-11-215. Employment agency license — Scope — Change of license.

An employment agent's license issued pursuant to this subchapter shall protect only those persons to whom it is issued and only the location for which it is issued.

A separate license shall be required for each separate office location operated by an employment agency.

No license shall be valid to protect any business transacted under any name other than that designated in the license.

No employment agent shall permit any person not mentioned in the license or license application to become a member, officer, director, shareholder, or partner in the conduct of the business of the employment agent unless written consent of the Director of the Division of Labor and written consent of the surety on the bond required by this subchapter shall first be obtained.

The location of an employment agency shall not be changed without written consent from the Director of the Division of Labor, and a new license application shall be required for any change of office location in excess of twenty-five (25) miles.

A charge of ten dollars ($10.00) shall be made by the Division of Labor for the recording of authorization for each change of office location authorized by this section.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1019; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 5380, 5381.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (b); and substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (d).

11-11-216. Examination for licenses.

Before the Director of the Division of Labor issues a license to an applicant for a permanent employment agent's, permanent agency manager's, or permanent counselor's license, the applicant shall be required to successfully complete a written examination prepared by the director.

The examination shall establish the competency of the applicant to:

Operate and conduct an employment agency; or

Perform service as an agency manager or counselor for the agency.

No examination shall be required for renewal of any license issued pursuant to this subchapter unless the license has been suspended, revoked, or submitted late, causing the application to be treated as a new application.

The Division of Labor shall hold examinations at such times and places as it shall reasonably determine, except that examinations shall be given to license applicants at least once every sixty (60) days.

An examination fee of five dollars ($5.00) shall be paid by each applicant in addition to the license fee.

The examination fee shall be retained by the division, whether or not the applicant successfully completes the examination.

The examination fee shall be forfeited if the applicant does not take the examination within three (3) months of the application date.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1022; Acts 2007, No. 827, § 128; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5382-5384.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a)(1)(A); substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (b); and substituted “division” for “department” in (c)(2).

11-11-217. License fees.

Before a permanent license shall be granted to a license applicant, an applicant shall pay the following annual fee for each license:

Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for an employment agency;

Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for an employment agency manager; and

Twenty dollars ($20.00) for an employment counselor.

Multiple licenses for a person simultaneously performing the functions of employment agent, agency manager, or employment counselor will not be required. The person shall procure a license commensurate with the highest level of job duties and responsibilities customarily and regularly performed by the person.

All moneys received from licensing shall be deposited into the general fund of the State Treasury.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1017.

11-11-218. Temporary licenses.

The Director of the Division of Labor shall have authority to issue a temporary license for operation of a private employment agency, which shall be valid for no more than ninety (90) days, upon submission by the applicant for the license of:

A properly completed application form furnished and approved by the director;

Submission of evidence of the applicant's compliance with the bonding requirements of this subchapter; and

Payment of a temporary license fee of one hundred dollars ($100).

The temporary license may be issued only if, after investigation, it reasonably appears that the applicant will meet the qualifications for a permanent private employment agency license.

The director shall have authority to issue temporary licenses for agency managers and employment counselors, which shall be valid for no more than ninety (90) days, upon submission by the applicant for such license of:

A properly completed application form, furnished and approved by the director; and

Payment of a temporary license fee of ten dollars ($10.00).

The temporary licenses for agency managers and employment counselors may be issued only if, after investigation, it reasonably appears that the applicant will meet the qualifications for a permanent license as agency manager or employment counselor.

Temporary licenses issued to agency managers and employment counselors are nontransferable and are automatically rescinded upon suspension or termination of the employment of the agency manager or employment counselor.

The director shall approve or reject an application for a temporary agency manager's license or temporary employment counselor's license within five (5) days after receipt of a properly completed application for the license.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1017; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5385.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in the introductory language of (a)(1).

11-11-219. Renewal of licenses.

Every license issued pursuant to this subchapter shall remain in force for one (1) year from the date of issue or until the end of the state's fiscal year, whichever occurs first, unless the license has been revoked pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter.

Applications for renewal of all licenses provided by this subchapter must be filed with the Director of the Division of Labor no later than thirty (30) days prior to expiration of the license.

Any licensee who fails to renew a license by the expiration date shall be automatically suspended from the right to engage in the activity authorized by the license until the license is renewed.

Every application for renewal of a license must be accompanied by payment of the required license fee and evidence of compliance with the bonding requirements of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1020; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5386.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (b).

11-11-220. Cessation of business by licensee.

If an employment agent ceases business operations, the agent shall, as soon as reasonably possible, notify the Division of Labor and shall deliver or forward by mail the agent's license to the division. Failure to give notice, or failure to deliver such employment agent's license, shall be a violation of § 11-11-208.

When one (1) or more individuals, on the basis of whose qualifications an agency license has been obtained, ceases to be connected with the licensed business for any reason whatsoever, the agency business may be carried on for a temporary period not to exceed thirty (30) days, under such terms and conditions as the Director of the Division of Labor shall provide by rule for the orderly closing of the business or the replacement and qualification of a new member, partner, or corporate officer, director, or shareholder.

The agency's authorization to continue to do business under this subchapter beyond the thirty-day period provided in this subdivision (a)(2) shall be contingent upon approval by the Director of the Division of Labor of any new member, principal, partner, officer, director, or shareholder.

If an agency manager terminates his or her employment with an employment agency by which he or she is employed, the agency shall notify the division, as soon as is reasonably possible, to enable the division to know at all times the identity of the person charged with the general management of each of the agency's office locations.

The employment agency shall also deliver or forward by mail the agency manager's license, together with the reasons why the agency manager has terminated his or her position with the employment agency.

If an employment counselor terminates his or her employment with the employment agency by which he or she is employed, the agency shall, as soon as is reasonably possible, notify the division and deliver or forward by mail the employment counselor's license to the division, together with the reasons for his or her termination.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, §§ 5, 8; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-1017, 81-1020; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 839; 2019, No. 910, §
5387.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (a)(2)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (a)(1); substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section; and substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a)(2)(A) and for “director” in (a)(2)(B).

11-11-221. Issuance, refusal, suspension, or revocation of license — Grounds.

The Director of the Division of Labor shall issue a license as an employment agent, agency manager, or counselor to any person who qualifies for the license under the terms of this subchapter.

The director may, in addition, refuse to issue a license to any person or may suspend or revoke the license of any employment agent, agency manager, or employment counselor or impose administrative fines as provided for in § 11-11-203 when the director finds that any of the following conditions exist:

That the employment agent, agency manager, or counselor has violated any of the provisions of this subchapter;

That the employment agent, agency manager, or counselor has violated any of the rules or other orders lawfully promulgated by the director;

That the employment agent, agency manager, or counselor has violated the conditions of the bond required by § 11-11-213;

That the person, employment agent, agency manager, or employment counselor has engaged in a fraudulent, deceptive, or dishonest practice;

That the person, employment agent, agency manager, or employment counselor has been legally adjudicated incompetent; or

That the applicant is for good and sufficient cause unfit to be an employment agent, agency manager, or employment counselor within the meaning of this subchapter or of any of the rules or orders lawfully promulgated by the director.

This section and § 11-11-222 shall not be construed to relieve any person from civil liability or from criminal prosecution under the provisions of this subchapter or under other laws of this state.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1025; Acts 2019, No. 315, §§ 840, 841; 2019, No. 910, §
5388.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(2) and (b)(6).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

11-11-222. Refusal, suspension, or revocation of license — Notice and hearing.

The Director of the Division of Labor may not refuse to issue a license or suspend or revoke a license unless it furnishes the person, employment agent, agency manager, or employment counselor with a written statement of the charges against him or her and affords him or her an opportunity to be heard on the charges.

At the time that written charges are furnished to an employment agency, the director shall make available to the agency a signed written statement by any individual having filed a complaint with the director relative to the matter for which charges have been filed by the director.

The agency shall be given at least twenty (20) days’ written notice of the date and time of the hearing. The notice shall conform to the standards for notices set forth in the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

The notice shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address of the person as shown on his or her application for license, or it may be served in the manner in which a summons is served in civil cases commenced in the circuit courts of this state.

At the time and place fixed for the hearing, the director shall hold the hearing and thereafter make his or her order either dismissing the charges or refusing, suspending, or revoking the license.

At the hearing, the accused shall have the right to appear personally and by counsel and to cross-examine witnesses against him or her.

He or she shall be allowed to produce evidence and witnesses in his or her defense and shall have the right to have witnesses subpoenaed.

The subpoenas shall be issued by the director.

A stenographic record of all proceedings shall be made, and a transcript of the proceedings shall be made if desired by the Division of Labor or by the accused.

The transcript shall be paid for by the party ordering it.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1025; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 5389, 5390.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a)(1); and substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (c)(1).